Oklahoma, session 2026, HB2471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 4, Chapter 361, O.S.L.
2023 (40 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 903), is amended to read as
follows:
Section 903. A. The Oklahoma Workforce Commission shall
consist of nine (9) fifteen (15) members. The nine fifteen (15)
members shall be consist of the following listed public officials
and private sector leaders conducting business in this state:
1. Lieutenant Governor;
2. Labor Commissioner;
3. Adjutant General;
Req. No. 16684 Page 1

4. State Superintendent of Public Instruction;
5. Director of the Department of Career and Technology
Education;
6. Chancellor of Higher Education;
7. Three members to be appointed by the President Pro Tempore
of the Senate;
2. 8. Three members to be appointed by the Speaker of the House
of Representatives; and
3. 9. Three members to be appointed by the Governor, one of
whom shall be designated by the Governor to serve as chair of the
Commission.
B. The members of the Commission shall be qualified electors of
this state and shall not be employed by any government entity or
have been employed by a government entity within the preceding one-
year period.
C. The members appointed under paragraphs 7 through 9 in
subsection A of this section shall not be employed by any government
entity or have been employed by a government entity within the
preceding one-year period.
D. For the initial appointments of Commissioners, each
appointing authority shall make one appointment for a one-year term,
one appointment for a two-year term, and one appointment for a
three-year term. Thereafter, the terms of the Commissioners shall

Req. No. 16684 Page 2

be f or three (3) years. Commissioners may be appointed to
subsequent terms without limit as to number.
D. E. Vacancies on the Commission shall be filled for the
unexpired term of office in the same manner as the original
appointment. The appointed members shall serve at the pleasure of
the appointing authorities.
E. F. In addition to the chair appointed by the Governor, the
Commission may establish and elect additional officers by a majority
vote of the Commissioners. The chair shall preside over meetings of
the Commission and officers shall perform duties as may be required
by the Commission. The first meeting of the Commission shall be
called by the chair no later than sixty (60) days after the
effective date of this act.
F. G. No member of the Commission shall receive a salary for
duties performed as a member of the Commission; however, members are
eligible to receive reimbursement for expenses and travel
reimbursement as provided for in the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
G. H. Members serving on the Commission shall be eligible to
serve on any other state board or commission if such member is
otherwise qualified to hold such appointed office, notwithstanding
the provisions of Section 6 of Title 51 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
H. I. A quorum of five eight members shall be required to
conduct official business of the Commission.

Req. No. 16684 Page 3

SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16684 TKR 02/24/26





















Req. No. 16684 Page 4